Washington statutes.
RCW 19.260.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Air compressor" means a compressor designed to compress air that has an inlet open to the atmosphere or other source of air and is made up of a compression element (bare compressor), a driver or drivers, mechanical equipment to drive the compressor element, and any ancillary equipment.

(2) "Air purifier," also known as "room air cleaner," means an electric, cord-connected, portable appliance with the primary function of removing particulate matter from the air and that can be moved from room to room.

(3) "ANSI" means the American national standards institute.

(4) "Bottle-type water dispenser" means a water dispenser that uses a bottle or reservoir as the source of potable water.

(5) "Commercial dishwasher" means a machine designed to clean and sanitize plates, pots, pans, glasses, cups, bowls, utensils, and trays by applying sprays of detergent solution, with or without blasting media granules, and a sanitizing rinse.

(6) "Commercial fryer" means an appliance, including a cooking vessel, in which oil is placed to such a depth that the cooking food is supported by displacement of the cooking fluid rather than by the bottom of the vessel. Heat is delivered to the cooking fluid by means of an immersed electric element of band-wrapped vessel (electric fryers) or by heat transfer from gas burners through either the walls of the fryer or through tubes passing through the cooking fluid (gas fryers).

(7) "Commercial hot food holding cabinet" means a heated, fully enclosed compartment, with one or more solid or partial glass doors, that is designed to maintain the temperature of hot food that has been cooked in a separate appliance. "Commercial hot food holding cabinet" does not include heated glass merchandising cabinets, drawer warmers, or cook and hold appliances.

(8) "Commercial oven" means a chamber designed for heating, roasting, or baking food by conduction, convection, radiation, or electromagnetic energy, or any combination thereof.

(9) "Commercial steam cooker" means a device with one or more food-steaming compartments in which the energy in the steam is transferred to the food by direct contact. Models may include countertop models, wall-mounted models, and floor models mounted on a stand, pedestal, or cabinet-style base.

(10) "Compensation" means money or any other valuable thing, regardless of form, received or to be received by a person for services rendered.

(11) "Compressor" means a machine or apparatus that converts different types of energy into the potential energy of gas pressure for displacement and compression of gaseous media to any higher-pressure values above atmospheric pressure and has a pressure ratio at full-load operating pressure greater than 1.3.

(12) "Cook and hold appliance" means a multiple mode appliance intended for cooking food that may be used to hold the temperature of the food that has been cooked in the same appliance.

(13) "CTA" means the consumer technology association.

(14) "Department" means the department of commerce.

(15) "Drawer warmer" means an appliance that consists of one or more heated drawers and that is designed to hold hot food that has been cooked in a separate appliance at a specified temperature.

(16) "Electric storage water heater" means a consumer product that uses electricity as the energy source to heat domestic potable water, has a nameplate input rating of twelve kilowatts or less, contains nominally forty gallons but no more than one hundred twenty gallons of rated hot water storage volume, and supplies a maximum hot water delivery temperature less than one hundred eighty degrees Fahrenheit.

(17)(a) "Electric vehicle supply equipment" means the conductors, including the ungrounded, grounded, and equipment grounding conductors, the electric vehicle connectors, attachment plugs, and all other fittings, devices, power outlets, or apparatuses installed specifically for the purpose of delivering energy from the premises wiring to the electric vehicle.

(b) "Electric vehicle supply equipment" does not include the conductors, connectors, and fittings that are part of a vehicle, and does not include charging cords with NEMA 5-15P or NEMA 5-20P attachment plugs.

(18) "General service lamp" has the same meaning as set forth in the action published at 82 Fed. Reg. 7276, 7321-22 (January 19, 2017) and modified by the action published at 82 Fed. Reg. 7322, 7333 (January 19, 2017).

(19) "Heated glass merchandising cabinet" means an appliance with a heated cabinet constructed of glass or clear plastic doors which, with seventy percent or more clear area, is designed to display and maintain the temperature of hot food that has been cooked in a separate appliance.

(20) "High color rendering index fluorescent lamp" or "high CRI fluorescent lamp" means a fluorescent lamp with a color rendering index of eighty-seven or greater that is not a compact fluorescent lamp.

(21) "Hot water dispenser" means a small electric water heater that has a measured storage volume of no greater than one gallon.

(22) "Industrial air purifier" means an indoor air cleaning device manufactured, advertised, marketed, labeled, and used solely for industrial use that is marketed solely through industrial supply outlets or businesses and prominently labeled as "Solely for industrial use. Potential health hazard: Emits ozone."

(23) "Mini-tank electric water heater" means a small electric water heater that has a measured storage volume of more than one gallon and a rated storage volume of less than twenty gallons.

(24) "Point-of-use water dispenser" means a water dispenser that uses a pressurized water utility connection as the source of potable water.

(25) "Portable air conditioner" means a portable encased assembly, other than a packaged terminal air conditioner, room air conditioner, or dehumidifier, that delivers cooled, conditioned air to an enclosed space, and is powered by single-phase electric current. It includes a source of refrigeration and may include additional means for air circulation and heating and may be a single-duct or a dual-duct portable air conditioner.

(26) "Portable electric spa" means a factory-built electric spa or hot tub, which may or may not include any combination of integral controls, water heating, or water circulating equipment.

(27) "Pressure regulator" means a device that maintains constant operating pressure immediately downstream from the device, given higher pressure upstream.

(28)(a) "Residential ventilating fan" means a fan whose purpose is to actively supply air to or remove air from the inside of a residence. A "residential ventilating fan" may also be designed to filter incoming air. "Residential ventilating fan" includes, but is not limited to: Ceiling and wall-mounted fans, or remotely mounted in-line fans, designed to be used in a bathroom or utility room; and supply fans designed to provide air to the indoor space.

(b) "Residential ventilating fan" does not include kitchen range hoods.

(29) "Signage display" means an analog or digital device designed primarily for the display for computer-generated signals that is not marketed for use as a computer monitor or a television.

(30) "Spray sprinkler body" means the exterior case or shell of a sprinkler incorporating a means of connection to the piping system designed to convey water to a nozzle or orifice.

(31) "Water cooler" means a freestanding device that consumes energy to cool or heat potable water, including cold only units, hot and cold units, cook and cold units, storage-type units, and on-demand units.

[ 2022 c 19 s 2; (2022 c 19 s 1 expired January 1, 2024). Prior: 2019 c 286 s 2; prior: 2009 c 565 s 18; 2009 c 501 s 1; 2006 c 194 s 1; 2005 c 298 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Effective date—2022 c 19 s 2: "Section 2 of this act takes effect January 1, 2024." [ 2022 c 19 s 7.]

Expiration date—2022 c 19 s 1: "Section 1 of this act expires January 1, 2024." [ 2022 c 19 s 6.]